Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE H. DISTRICTS GOVERNING GROUNDWATER

CHAPTER 8818. HICKORY UNDERGROUND WATER CONSERVATION

DISTRICT NO. 1

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8818.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Hickory Underground Water Conservation District No. 1.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (H.B. 556), Sec. 5, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 8818.002. ELECTION PROCEDURES. (a) Notwithstanding Section 61.012, Election Code, for an election held by the district, other than an election that is held jointly with another election in which a federal office appears on the ballot, the use of a voting station that meets the requirements for accessibility under 42 U.S.C. Section 15481(a)(3) is not required.

(b) The board of directors of the district shall notify the secretary of state if the district does not provide at least one voting station at each polling place used in the election that meets the requirements for accessibility under 42 U.S.C. Section 15481(a)(3).

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (H.B. 556), Sec. 5, eff. June 15, 2007.